Wyoming, session 2025, SF0093.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-15-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xi) and 39-16-105(a) by creating a new paragraph
(xi) are amended to read:

39-15-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following sales or leases are exempt from the
excise tax imposed by this article:

SF0093

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0151
(xi) Sales of tangible personal property,
admissions or services sourced to land held in trust by the
United States for the benefit of only one (1) tribe on the
Wind River Indian Reservation.

39-16-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following purchases or leases are exempt from
the excise tax imposed by this article:

(xi) Purchases of tangible personal property,
admissions or services sourced to land held in trust by the
United States for the benefit of only one (1) tribe on the
Wind River Indian Reservation.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0093